Washington statutes.
RCW 26.12.030

Transfer of cases to presiding judge.

The judge of the family court may transfer any case before the family court pursuant to this chapter to the department of the presiding judge of the superior court for assignment for trial or other proceedings by another judge of the court, whenever in the opinion of the judge of the family court such transfer is necessary to expedite the business of the family court or to insure the prompt consideration of the case. When any case is so transferred, the judge to whom it is transferred shall act as the judge of the family court in the matter.

[ 1949 c 50 s 3; Rem. Supp. 1949 s 997-32.]